Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1073.
do enact as follows:AB1073,13Section 1. 948.09 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1073,2,51948.09 Sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a child age 16 or 2older. Whoever has sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a child who is not the 3defendant’s spouse and who has attained the age of 16 years is guilty of a Class A 4misdemeanor I felony if the defendant has attained the age of 19 years when the 5violation occurs.AB1073,2,66